Louisiana, session 2026, HB404.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:574.63 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§574.63. Medication-assisted treatment program
A. For purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Inmate" refers to all persons incarcerated in state and local correction
facilities, whether in pretrial detention or incarcerated following a conviction.
(2) "Medication-assisted treatment" means treatment of chemical dependence
or abuse and concomitant conditions with medications requiring a prescription or
order from an authorized prescribing professional.
B.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, in
conjunction with the Louisiana Department of Health and the Louisiana Sheriffs'
Association, shall establish a program to be administered at correctional facilities in
this state, for the purpose of employing medication-assisted treatment for inmates
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1155 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 404
who are undergoing treatment for a substance abuse disorder. The program shall
include all forms of medication-assisted treatments approved for the treatment of a
substance abuse disorder by the Federal Food and Drug Administration for the
duration of an inmate's incarceration and shall provide an individual treatment plan
for each participant. After a medical screening, inmates who are determined to
suffer from a substance abuse disorder shall be offered placement in the medication-
assisted treatment program. Placement in the program shall not be mandatory. Each
participating inmate shall work with an authorized specialist to determine an
individual treatment plan, including an appropriate level of counseling. Decisions
regarding type, dosage, or duration of any medication regimen shall be made by a
qualified health care professional licensed or certified by the Louisiana State Board
of Medical Examiners or the Louisiana State Board of Nursing who is authorized to
administer such medication in conjunction with the inmate.
(2)(a) The program shall also include conditions for a reentry strategy for
inmates who have participated in medication-assisted treatment. The reentry strategy
shall include but not be limited to providing each participating inmate with
information on available treatment facilities in his respective area, information on
available housing and employment resources, and any other information that will
assist the inmate in continued recovery once released. The strategy shall also assist
the inmate in Medicaid enrollment prior to release.
(b) The medication-assisted treatment program shall provide participating
inmates who are preparing for release from custody with a one-week supply of any
necessary medication permissible under federal laws and regulations to continue
medication-assisted treatment to prevent relapse.
(c) Reentry planning and community supervision shall include a
collaborative relationship between clinical staff and the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections, division of probation and parole, including the sharing of accurate
information regarding the inmate's participation in the medication-assisted treatment
program to ensure that his medication is not considered illicit or illegal. Additionally,
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1155 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 404
the secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, in conjunction with
the Louisiana Department of Health and the Louisiana Sheriffs' Association, shall
develop internal procedures to assist anyone released under supervision who
communicates a relapse with his probation or parole officer, or who fails a drug test,
to receive substance abuse disorder support in lieu of arrest or incarceration.
C. The secretary shall annually submit a report to the governor and the
legislature on the effectiveness of the program established in this Section. The report
shall include an analysis of the impact of the medication-assisted treatment program
on participating inmates, including data such as recidivism, institutional discipline
records, HIV and hepatitis C treatment, and other program participation. The
secretary shall include in the report the impact on institutional safety and
performance and any recommendations for additional legislative enactments needed
to improve the program.
D. Participation in the medication-assisted treatment program shall not be
withheld from a qualified inmate. An inmate may enter into the program at any time
during his incarceration. An inmate enrolled in the program prior to his
incarceration is eligible, upon request by the inmate, to continue participation in the
program for any period of time during the duration of his incarceration. No person
shall be denied participation or receive a disciplinary infraction on the basis of a
positive drug screening upon entering custody or upon intake into the program. No
person shall be removed from or denied participation in the program on the basis of
having received a disciplinary infraction before entry into the program or during
participation in the program.
E. Medication-assisted treatment program services shall include all of the
following:
(1) Plans for alcohol, benzodiazepine, heroin, and opioid withdrawal
management.
(2)(a) At least one formulation of every medication-assisted treatment
approved for the treatment of substance abuse disorder by the Federal Food and Drug
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1155 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 404
Administration necessary to ensure that each participant in the program receives the
particular form found to be the most effective at treating and meeting his individual
needs.
(b) Local correctional facilities may apply for limited exemption from the
requirements of providing opioid agonist treatment medications upon a showing to
the secretary, Louisiana Sheriffs' Association, and Louisiana Department of Health
that no providers with the required accreditation are located within a reasonable
distance of the facility. A facility that lacks the resources available to meet the
standards set forth by this Section may apply for a limited exemption, allowing the
facility to enter into agreements with community-based programs offering substance
abuse disorder treatments and transition services. Any such exemptions shall be
reviewed on a regular basis.
(3) Group and individual counseling and clinical support.
(4) Peer support.
(5) Discharge planning.
(6) Reentry and transitional support.
F. Funding for the medication-assisted treatment program shall be
apportioned from state opioid settlement funds and subsidized by federal funding,
as available. If such funds become unavailable, the program shall be subject to
appropriation by the legislature.
Section 2. The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
submit the report required in R.S. 15:574.63(C) as enacted by Section 1 of this Act by
August 1, 2027, and annually thereafter.